District of Columbia statutes.
2-220.01

Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Living Wage Act of 2006”.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-118, § 101, 53 DCR 2602

History

This section is referenced in § 1-301.181.

Section References

Delegation of Authority pursuant to D.C. Law 16-118, the “Way to Work Amendment Act of 2006”, see Mayor’s Order 2006-122, September 27, 2006 ( 53 DCR 9313).

Delegation of Authority